Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Liming Materials [Repealed]

43-11-201 — 43-11-210. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 43-11-201 — 43-11-210 (Acts 1951, ch. 242, §§ 1-10 (Williams. §§ 519.6-519.15); Acts 1985, ch. 194, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 43-1201 — 43-1210, 43-12-101, 43-12-102, 43-12-104 — 43-12-110; T.C.A., 43-12-103), concerning liming materials, were repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 7, § 1. For present law, see part 4 of this chapter.